Florida, session 2026, SB136.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 19 20 Section 1.âSection 112.0556, Florida Statutes, is created 21 to read: 22 112.0556âMedical Marijuana Public Employee Protection Act.â 23 (1)âAs used in this section, the term: 24 (a)ââAdverse personnel actionâ means the refusal to hire or 25 employ a qualified patient; the discharge, suspension, transfer, 26 or demotion of a qualified patient; the mandatory retirement of 27 a qualified patient; or the discrimination against a qualified 28 patient with respect to compensation, terms, conditions, or 29 privileges of employment. 30 (b)ââJob applicantâ means a person who has applied for a 31 position with a public employer and has been offered employment 32 conditioned upon his or her passing a drug test. 33 (c)ââLaw enforcement agencyâ has the same meaning as in s. 34 908.102. 35 (d)ââPhysician certificationâ has the same meaning as in s. 36 381.986. 37 (e)ââPublic employeeâ or âemployeeâ means an employee of a 38 public employer. 39 (f)ââPublic employerâ or âemployerâ means a state, 40 regional, county, local, or municipal governmental entity, 41 whether executive, judicial, or legislative; an official, an 42 officer, a department, a division, a bureau, a commission, an 43 authority, or a political subdivision of such entity; or a 44 public school, a Florida College System institution, or a state 45 university, any of which employs individuals for salary, wages, 46 or other remuneration. 47 (g)ââQualified patientâ has the same meaning as in s. 48 381.986. 49 (h)ââUndue hardshipâ means an action requiring significant 50 difficulty or expense, when considered in light of all of the 51 following factors: 52 1.âThe nature, cost, and duration of the accommodation. 53 2.âThe overall financial resources of the public employer. 54 3.âThe overall size of the business of the public employer 55 with respect to the number of employees and the number, type, 56 and location of the public employerâs facilities. 57 4.âThe effect on expenses and resources or any other 58 impacts of such accommodation upon the operation of the public 59 employer. 60 (2)(a)âExcept as provided in paragraph (b), a public 61 employer may not take adverse personnel action against an 62 employee or a job applicant for his or her use of medical 63 marijuana if the employee or job applicant is a qualified 64 patient under s. 381.986. 65 (b)âA public employer may take appropriate adverse 66 personnel action against an employee if the public employer 67 establishes by a preponderance of the evidence that the lawful 68 use of medical marijuana is impairing the employeeâs ability to 69 perform his or her job duties or responsibilities. 70 (c)âFor purposes of this subsection, a public employer may 71 consider an employeeâs ability to perform his or her job duties 72 or responsibilities to be impaired if the employee displays 73 specific, articulable symptoms while working which adversely 74 affect the performance of his or her duties or responsibilities. 75 (3)(a)âIf a public employer has a drug testing policy and 76 an employee or a job applicant tests positive for marijuana or 77 its metabolites, the employer must provide to the employee or 78 job applicant written notice, within 5 business days after 79 receipt of the positive test result, of his or her right to 80 provide an explanation for or contest the positive test result. 81 (b)âWithin 5 business days after receipt of the written 82 notice in paragraph (a), the employee or job applicant may 83 submit information to his or her employer explaining or 84 contesting the positive test result or may request a 85 confirmation test, as defined in s. 112.0455(5), at the expense 86 of the employee or job applicant. 87 (c)âAn employee or a job applicant may submit a physician 88 certification for medical marijuana use or a medical marijuana 89 use registry identification card as part of his or her 90 explanation for the positive test result. 91 (d)âIf an employee or a job applicant fails to provide a 92 satisfactory explanation for the positive test result, his or 93 her employer must verify the positive test result with a 94 confirmation test, at the expense of the employer, before the 95 employer may take adverse personnel action against the employee 96 or job applicant. 97 (4)(a)âNotwithstanding s. 381.986(15), a public employee or 98 a job applicant who has been the subject of an adverse personnel 99 action in violation of this section may institute a civil action 100 in a court of competent jurisdiction for relief as set forth in 101 paragraph (c) within 180 days after the alleged violation. 102 (b)âA public employee or a job applicant may not recover in 103 any action brought under this subsection if the adverse 104 personnel action was predicated upon a ground other than his or 105 her exercise of a right protected by this section. 106 (c)âIn any action brought under this subsection, the court 107 may order any of the following: 108 1.âAn injunction restraining continued violation of this 109 section. 110 2.âReinstatement of the public employee to the same 111 position held before the adverse personnel action, or to an 112 equivalent position. 113 3.âReinstatement of full fringe benefits and seniority 114 rights. 115 4.âCompensation for lost wages, benefits, and other 116 remuneration. 117 5.âReasonable attorney fees and costs. 118 6.âAny other compensatory damages allowed by general law. 119 (5)âThis section does not do any of the following: 120 (a)âProhibit a public employer from taking adverse 121 personnel action against an employee for the possession or use 122 of a controlled substance, as defined in s. 893.02, during 123 normal business hours or require an employer to commit any act 124 that would cause the employer to violate federal law or that 125 would result in the loss of a federal contract or federal 126 funding. 127 (b)âRequire a governmental medical assistance program or 128 private health insurer to reimburse a person for costs 129 associated with his or her use of medical marijuana. 130 (c)âRequire a public employer to modify the job or working 131 conditions of a person who engages in the use of medical 132 marijuana based on the reasonable business purposes of the 133 employer. However, notwithstanding s. 381.986(15) and except as 134 provided in paragraph (d), such employer must attempt to make 135 reasonable accommodations for the medical needs of an employee 136 who engages in the use of medical marijuana if the employee 137 holds a valid medical marijuana use registry identification 138 card, unless the employer can demonstrate that the accommodation 139 would pose a threat of harm or danger to persons or property, 140 impose an undue hardship on the employer, or prevent an employee 141 from fulfilling his or her job responsibilities. 142 (d)âProhibit a law enforcement agency from adopting 143 policies and procedures that preclude an employee from engaging 144 in the use of medical marijuana. 145 Section 2.âThis act shall take effect upon becoming a law.